Alabama, session 2026rs, HB61.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
In Covington County, no person may inject, store, or
sequester carbon dioxide or nonhazardous fluids in underground
wells. This prohibition includes the operation of a Class V
and Class VI well as defined by the United States
Page 1

and Class VI well as defined by the United States
HB61 INTRODUCED
Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the Underground
Injection Control Program of the Safe Drinking Water Act, 42
U.S.C. § 300f et seq.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284, 284.01, and 285
of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
of this state. The appropriate election official shall assign
a ballot number for the proposed constitutional amendment on
the election ballot and shall set forth the following
description of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Relating to Covington County, proposing an amendment
to the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to prohibit the
injection and storage of carbon dioxide and nonhazardous
fluids in underground wells in the county.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
Page 2

language:
HB61 INTRODUCED
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved by
a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 3